Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 7. Sale or Development of Airport Lands, or Other Lands, for Industrial Purposes

§ 57-7-1.
Sale or lease of surplus government lands for improvement for industrial and commercial purposes; improvement of property.

In the event that any municipality, county, supervisors district, municipal airport authority, regional airport authority or other governmental subdivision shall have surplus airport land or other lands which are not needed for airport purposes or for other governmental purposes, then such property so designated and described may be set aside and improved for industrial and commercial purposes and the same may thereafter be operated or the same may be leased or sold upon such terms and conditions as a municipality, county, municipal airport authority, regional airport authority or governmental subdivision shall prescribe.

In order to provide for the improvement of such property for industrial and commercial purposes, the municipality or other authority shall be authorized to provide all necessary utilities therefor and to lay out, construct and/or improve and hard-surface roadways, streets, driveways and access roads, railroads and spur tracks, and provide for the grading, drainage, sewer, lights and water, and all other necessary or proper utilities as may be necessary or proper to make such land desirable or useful as a site or sites for industrial and commercial enterprises. The cost and expense of such improvements to said real estate shall be paid for from funds made available from the lease or sale of such lands to the extent such funds are available.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-61; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 410, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 379, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 57-7-3.
Authorization for issuance of bonds; sale of bonds; interest rate; liability on bonds.

For the purpose of providing funds to defray the expenses of improving and developing the airport properties as set forth in Section 57-7-1, the said municipality or other authority shall have the right to borrow money for the industrial improvement of its lands and property, and to issue revenue bonds therefor, payable out of any revenues derived from such property, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources. Such bonds may be sold at public or private sale at not less than par and shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. Any such bonds so issued shall not constitute a debt of any municipality, the state, or any political subdivision thereof, other than the municipality or other authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-62; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 425; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 13; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 26; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 57-7-5.
Details of bonds.

All bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall bear such date or dates, shall be in such form or denomination, shall bear such rate of interest, and shall mature at such times as the said municipality or other authority shall determine, but no bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall mature more than twenty-five (25) years from the date of the issuance thereof and none of said bonds shall be sold for less than par and accrued interest. All such bonds shall be sold in the manner now provided by law for the sale of bonds without any restrictions, limitations, requirements or conditions applicable to the borrowing of such money and the issuance of such bonds which are not herein contained. The denomination, form, place of payment and other details of such bonds may be determined by resolution or order of the municipality or other authority, and shall be executed on behalf of the municipality or other authority as is now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-63; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1964).

§ 57-7-7.
Notice of intent to issue bonds; requirement of election on bond issue.

Before issuing any bonds under the provisions of this chapter, the municipality or other authority shall, by resolution spread upon the minutes, declare its intention to issue such bonds for the purposes authorized by this chapter and shall state in said resolution the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and shall likewise fix in said resolution the date upon which the said municipality or other authority proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Notice of such intention shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the municipality or the governmental subdivision issuing the bonds, with the first publication of said notice to be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in the resolution for the issuance of said bonds and the last publication to be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If, on or before the date specified in the resolution, twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the municipality or other governmental subdivision shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds, then an election upon the issuance thereof shall be called, and held, as is hereby provided. If no such protest shall be filed, then the said municipality or other authority may issue such bonds without an election on the question of the issuance thereof at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the resolution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-64; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1964).

§ 57-7-9.
Conduct of election.

If an election shall be called under the provisions of this chapter on the question of the issuance of bonds, the election shall be held, insofar as practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in said municipality or other governmental subdivision. At such election, all qualified electors of the municipality or other governmental subdivision may vote and the ballots used in such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purposes of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and the words “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE,” and the voters shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (Π) opposite their choice on the proposition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-65; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1964).

§ 57-7-11.
Determination of results of election.

When the results of any election hereinabove provided for shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of said municipality or governmental district and certified by them to the proper authorities, it shall be the duty of the municipality or other authority involved to determine and adjudicate whether or not a majority of the qualified electors who voted in such election voted in favor of such bonds and unless a majority of the qualified electors who voted in said election shall have voted in favor of such bonds, then the same shall not be issued. Should a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of said bonds, the municipality or other authority may issue said bonds, either in whole or in part, within two (2) years from the date of such election, or within two (2) years after final favorable determination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds at such time or times, and in such amount or amounts, not exceeding that specified in the notice of the election, as shall be deemed proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-66; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1964).

§ 57-7-13.
Construction of chapter; applicability of debt limitation.

This chapter, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the issuance of bonds and borrowing of money as hereby authorized by municipalities or other governmental authority, and shall be construed as an additional and alternate method therefor. The bonds hereby authorized shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation or restriction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-67; Laws, 1964, ch. 290, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1964).